Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.035

Powers.

Each association subject to this chapter shall have the following powers:

(1) To have perpetual succession by its corporate name unless a limited period of duration is stated in the articles of incorporation.

(2) To sue and be sued, complain, and defend in its corporate name.

(3) To have and use a corporate seal.

(4) To purchase, take, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and deal in and with real or personal property or any interest therein, wherever situated.

(5) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets.

(6) To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, use, and deal in and with shares or other interest in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign corporations, associations, partnerships or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United States or any other government, state, territory, governmental district or municipality, or any instrumentality thereof.

(7) To make contracts and incur liabilities, borrow money at rates of interest the association may determine, issue notes, bonds, certificates of indebtedness, and other obligations, receive funds from members and pay interest thereon, issue capital stock and certificates representing equity interests in assets, allocate earnings and losses at the times and in the manner the articles of incorporation or bylaws or other contract specify, create book credits, capital funds, and reserves, and secure obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises, and income.

(8) To lend money for corporate purposes, invest and reinvest funds, and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds loaned or invested.

(9) To conduct business, carry on operations, have offices, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter, within or without this state.

(10) To elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation, define their duties, and fix their compensation.

(11) To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the association.

(12) To make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes, and in time of war to make donations in aid of war activities.

(13) To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit-sharing plans, stock bonus plans, stock option plans, and other incentive plans for any or all of its directors, officers, and employees.

(14) To be a partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise.

(15) To cease corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise.

(16) To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect its purposes.

[ 1989 c 307 s 6.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.